District of Columbia statutes.
44-951.11

Procurement law inapplicable.

(a)

Chapter 3A of Title 2 and its implementing regulations shall not apply to the Corporation; except, that the Corporation shall be required to comply with the requirements regarding multiyear contracts and contracts in excess of $1 million during a 12-month period pursuant to §§ 1-204.51 and 2-352.02.

(b)

Procurement policies employed by the United Medical Center on the day prior to September 14, 2011, shall continue until the Corporation develops new procurement policies.

Sept. 14, 2011, D.C. Law 19-21, § 5122, 58 DCR 6226